North Carolina statutes. Chapter 59. Partnership.
Part 1. General Provisions.

§ 59-73.1.
Definitions.

As used in this Article:

“Business entity” means a domestic corporation (including a professional corporation as defined in

G.S. 55B-2

), a foreign corporation (including a foreign professional corporation as defined in

G.S. 55B-16

), a domestic or foreign nonprofit corporation, a domestic or foreign limited liability company, a domestic or foreign limited partnership, a domestic partnership, or any other partnership.

“Domestic partnership” means a partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-36

that is formed under the laws of this State, including a registered limited liability partnership, but excluding a domestic limited partnership.

“Partnership” means a partnership as defined in

G.S. 59-36

whether or not formed under the laws of this State including a registered limited liability partnership and a foreign limited liability partnership, but excluding a domestic limited partnership and a foreign limited partnership.

History.

1999-369, s. 4.1; 2001-387, ss. 106, 107.

§§ 59-73.2 through 59-73.7.

Recodified as §§ 59-73.20, 59-73.30, 59-73.31, 58-73.32, and 59-73.33, respectively, by Session Laws 2001-387, s. 105(b).

§§ 59-73.8,
59-73.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.